Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Consistent with all  other Oregon laws, the Water Resources Department
shall collaborate with  the Confederated Tribes of the Umatilla Indian Reservation and the
State of Washington to implement and guide cooperative, bistate water management  in the
Walla Walla River Basin pursuant to the Walla Walla Water 2050 Strategic Plan, under  ad-
vice from a Walla Walla River Basin  advisory committee consisting of representatives from
a broad range of interests, including agricultural, environmental  and other stakeholders and
federal, tribal, state and local governments.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that:
(a) The State of Oregon shall share in the cost of implementing the Walla Walla Water
2050 Strategic Plan, subject to the availability of moneys appropriated for this purpose; and
(b) At least one-half of  the total costs of implementing the Walla Walla Water 2050
Strategic Plan will be funded through federal, private and  other nonstate sources, including
funding from private entities that benefit from projects under the Walla Walla Water 2050
Strategic Plan.
(3) The department shall implement the Walla Walla Water 2050 Strategic  Plan as an
integrated water resources approach that invites coordination  among the State of Oregon
and the State of Washington, affected federally recognized Indian tribes, agencies  and com-
munity stakeholders, including stakeholders concerned  with agriculture, the environment
and business.
(4) In developing water  supply solutions in the Walla Walla River Basin, the department
shall use an integrated water resources management  approach, consistent with the policy
described in ORS 536.220  and other Oregon laws, that provides concurrent water supply
benefits to in-stream, out-of-stream and ground  water uses and addresses a variety of water
resource and ecosystem challenges affecting fish passage, habitat functions and agricultural,
municipal, industrial and domestic water supply, consistent with the Walla Walla Water  2050
Strategic Plan.
(5) In consultation with affected federally  recognized Indian tribes, and in cooperation
with the State of Washington, the department shall  assess the development of a legal and
regulatory framework, coordinated between the State of Oregon and  the State of
Washington, for the allocation, distribution and management of developed water resources.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1567 (SB 1567-INTRO) Page 1
(6) In undertaking programs or using moneys appropriated by  the Legislative Assembly,
agencies, as defined in ORS 183.310, may,  consistent with all other Oregon laws concerning
the programs or use of  the moneys, fund the study, design, engineering and construction of
projects implementing the Walla Walla Water 2050 Strategic Plan that are located  wholly or
partially in the State of Washington if the projects:
(a) Benefit in-stream, out-of-stream or ground water demands in this state; and
(b) Are consistent with the objectives of the Walla Walla Water 2050 Strategic Plan.
SECTION 2.
(1) On or before June 30, 2026, the Water Resources  Department shall sub-
mit a report, in  the manner prescribed in ORS 192.245, to a committee or interim committee
of the Legislative Assembly related to water that  contains recommendations for a legal and
regulatory framework to promote equitable allocation,  distribution and management of de-
veloped water resources and  water supplies resulting from projects undertaken under the
Walla Walla Water 2050 Strategic Plan.
(2) In coordination with the Confederated Tribes  of the Umatilla Indian Reservation and
the State of Washington, the department shall report to the Walla Walla  River Basin advi-
sory committee described in section 1  (1) of this 2024 Act on the development of a legal and
regulatory framework described in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Three times in 2025; and
(b) Three times in 2026 before the date specified in subsection (1) of this section.
Passed by Senate February 21, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1567 (SB 1567-INTRO) Page 2